South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H5271.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 43-5-15 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 43-5-15. (A) Applications for assistance under the provisions of this chapter shall be made as provided in this chapter and when no such provision has been made in accordance with the manner and form prescribed by the department. (B) Prior to approval of an application for assistance, the department must verify an applicant's citizenship status and benefit eligibility pursuant to the provisions of Chapter 29, Title 8. Unless otherwise required by federal law, the department shall not approve an application for assistance without verifying that the applicant is a United States citizen and eligible to receive the requested benefits. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----